Georgia statutes. TITLE 46 Public Utilities and Public Transportation
Article 8 Liens Against Companies Generally

46-8-250 through 46-8-254.
[Reserved]

History.

Ga. L. 1876, p. 122, §§ 1, 2; Code 1882, § 278a; Ga. L. 1893, p. 91, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1894, p. 68, §§ 1, 2; Civil Code 1895, §§ 2329-2333; Civil Code 1910, §§ 2793-2797; Code 1933, §§ 94-801 — 94-805; repealed by Ga. L. 2006, p. 699, § 8/SB 285, effective July 1, 2006.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2006, p. 699, § 8/SB 285 repealed and reserved this article, effective July 1, 2006.